Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3123
Employees of departments transferred to Department of Health and Human Services; how treated.

On and after July 1, 2007, positions of employment in the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Health and Human Services Finance and Support, and the Department of Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure related to the powers, duties, and functions transferred pursuant to the Health and Human Services Act are transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services. For purposes of the transition, employees of the former departments shall be considered employees of the Department of Health and Human Services and shall retain their rights under the state personnel system or pertinent bargaining agreement, and their service shall be deemed continuous. This section does not grant employees any new rights or benefits not otherwise provided by law or bargaining agreement or preclude the divisions or the chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services from exercising any of the prerogatives of management set forth in section 81-1311 or as otherwise provided by law. This section is not an amendment to or substitute for the provisions of any existing bargaining agreements.

Laws 2007, LB296, § 14.